California, session 20252026, AB733.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Information gathering is an integral part of the policymaking process.(b) Reports required by the Legislature are necessary to evaluate the effectiveness and efficiency of state programs.(c) The Legislature is responsible for exercising oversight over state agencies.(d) Legislative oversight ensures government accountability and the responsible expenditure of public funds.(e) The Legislature is responsible for passing the Budget Bill and may withhold appropriations for any agency that fails to submit timely reports.SEC. 2. Section 9796 is added to the Government Code, to read:9796. (a) For purposes of this section, “report” means a report required by law to be submitted by a state agency to the Members of either house of the Legislature generally that the agency is required to submit pursuant to a provision of law that is effective on or after January 1, 2026.(b) By April 1 of each year, each state agency that is required to submit one or more reports shall submit to the Legislature, in a printed form to the Secretary of the Senate and in an electronic form to the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, a list of all reports the agency has not yet submitted to the Legislature as of that date. The list shall include all of the following:(1) A status summary for each report and a statement explaining why any overdue report has not yet been submitted.(2) A compliance plan for the submission of each report, including a timeline for submitting the report that specifies identifiable goals, objectives, and benchmarks to be met prior to completion and submission of each report.(c) Upon receiving the lists required to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (b), the Chief Clerk of the Assembly shall forward those lists to the Assembly Committee on Budget, and the Secretary of the Senate shall forward those lists to the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review.(d) The Assembly Committee on Budget or the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review may require an agency that has failed to submit timely reports to appear before the committee and explain the failure to submit those reports as required.(e) The Legislature may consider, in connection with the state budget, information obtained pursuant to this section and withhold appropriations to an agency that fails to submit timely reports.